Texas statutes.
LABOR CODE

TITLE 4. EMPLOYMENT SERVICES AND UNEMPLOYMENT

SUBTITLE B. TEXAS WORKFORCE COMMISSION; WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT; EMPLOYMENT SERVICES

CHAPTER 304. COUNSELING FOR DISPLACED HOMEMAKERS OR WORKERS

Sec. 304.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "displaced homemaker" means a person who:

(1) has worked without pay as a homemaker for the person's family;

(2) is not gainfully employed;

(3) has had, or would have, difficulty in obtaining employment; and

(4) has depended on:

(A) the income of a family member for financial support and has lost that income; or

(B) government assistance as the parent of dependent children and is no longer eligible for that assistance.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Renumbered from Labor Code Sec. 302.001 and amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 11.04, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 304.002. JOB COUNSELING PROGRAM. (a) The commission, through a special assistance job counseling program, shall:

(1) provide counseling for displaced homemakers;

(2) assist displaced homemakers in obtaining training and education; and

(3) place displaced homemakers in suitable employment.

(b) The counseling must:

(1) consider and build on the skills and experiences of the homemaker; and

(2) prepare the person, through employment counseling, to reenter the paid work force and develop and improve job skills.

(c) The commission shall design the program specifically for persons reentering the paid work force after a number of years as homemakers to enable them to assume or resume a valuable role in the paid work force commensurate with the homemakers' talents and abilities.

(d) The commission may not charge a fee for participation in the program by a displaced homemaker.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Renumbered from Labor Code Sec. 302.002 by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 11.04, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 304.003. PERSONNEL; OFFICE. The commission shall use its personnel, services, facilities, and equipment to operate the job counseling program.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Renumbered from Labor Code Sec. 302.003 by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 11.04, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 304.004. COOPERATION BY STATE AGENCIES AND POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS. State agencies and political subdivisions of the state shall cooperate with the commission in obtaining suitable employment for displaced homemakers counseled by the commission.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Renumbered from Labor Code Sec. 302.004 by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 11.04, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 304.005. HOME OWNERSHIP COUNSELING FOR DISPLACED WORKERS. (a) The commission shall provide written notice in English and in Spanish of eligibility for home ownership counseling under federal law to each worker residing in this state who is eligible for home ownership counseling under 12 U.S.C. Section 1701x, as amended, and who:

(1) is covered by a certification of eligibility for adjustment assistance under 19 U.S.C. Section 2331, as amended; or

(2) is threatened to become totally or partially separated, or has become totally or partially separated, from a firm that is certified eligible for adjustment assistance under 19 U.S.C. Section 2341, as amended.

(b) The notice must contain:

(1) a list of home ownership counseling organizations that:

(A) receive assistance under 12 U.S.C. Section 1701x, as amended; and

(B) serve the area in which the worker's home is located; or

(2) any toll-free telephone number through which the worker can obtain the list prescribed by Subdivision (1).

(c) A firm located in this state that has requested a certification of eligibility for adjustment assistance under 19 U.S.C. Section 2341, as amended, shall notify the commission of that request.

(d) In this section, "firm" has the meaning assigned by 19 U.S.C. Section 2351, as amended.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 289, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.